Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-370
County number system; alphanumeric system.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:

(a) In counties having a population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more according to the most recent federal decennial census, registration of motor vehicles or trailers shall be by the alphanumeric system; and

(b) In all other counties, registration of motor vehicles or trailers shall be, at the option of each county board, by either the alphanumeric system or the county number system.

(2) Counties using the county number system shall show on motor vehicles or trailers licensed therein a county number on the license plate preceding a dash which shall then be followed by the registration number assigned to the motor vehicle or trailer. The county numbers assigned to the counties in Nebraska shall be as follows:

No.Name of CountyNo.Name of County 1Douglas2Lancaster3Gage4Custer5Dodge6Saunders7Madison8Hall9Buffalo10Platte11Otoe12Knox 13Cedar14Adams15Lincoln16Seward 17York18Dawson19Richardson20Cass21Scotts Bluff22Saline 23Boone24Cuming25Butler26Antelope 27 Wayne28Hamilton29Washington30Clay31Burt32Thayer 33Jefferson34Fillmore35Dixon36Holt37Phelps38Furnas39 Cheyenne40Pierce41Polk42Nuckolls43Colfax44Nemaha45Webster46Merrick47Valley48Red Willow49Howard50Franklin51Harlan52Kearney 53Stanton54Pawnee55Thurston56Sherman57Johnson58Nance59Sarpy60Frontier61Sheridan62Greeley 63Boyd64Morrill65Box Butte66Cherry67Hitchcock68Keith69Dawes70Dakota71Kimball72Chase 73Gosper74Perkins 75Brown76Dundy77Garden78Deuel79Hayes80Sioux81Rock82Keya Paha83Garfield84Wheeler85Banner86Blaine 87Logan88Loup 89Thomas90McPherson91Arthur92Grant93Hooker

(3) Counties using the alphanumeric system shall show on the license plates of motor vehicles or trailers licensed therein a combination of three letters followed by a combination of three numerals. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations creating alphanumeric distinctions on the license plates based upon the registration of the motor vehicle or trailer and designating plate types that shall display county numbers on a statewide basis, taking into consideration cost, the need for uniformity, factors applicable to the production, distribution, and use of specific plate types, and any other factors consistent with the purposes of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act that the director deems relevant.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 70;

Laws 2016, LB811, § 1.